Vermont, session 2025-2026, H394.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 4352 is amended to read:
§ 4352. OPTIONAL DETERMINATION OF ENERGY COMPLIANCE;
ENHANCED ENERGY PLANNING
* * *
(c) Enhanced energy planning; requirements. To obtain an affirmative
determination of energy compliance under this section, a plan must:
VT LEG #379055 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.394
2025 Page 2 of 8
(1) in the case of a regional plan, include the energy element as
described in subdivision 4348a(a)(3) of this title;
(2) in the case of a municipal plan, include an energy element that has
the same components as described in subdivision 4348a(a)(3) of this title for a
regional plan and be confirmed under section 4350 of this title;
(3) be consistent with the following, with consistency determined in the
manner described under subdivision 4302(f)(1) of this title:
(A) Vermont’s greenhouse gas reduction goals requirements under 10
V.S.A. § 578(a);
(B) Vermont’s 25 by 25 goal for renewable energy under 10 V.S.A.
§ 580;
(C) Vermont’s building efficiency goals under 10 V.S.A. § 581;
(D) State energy policy under 30 V.S.A. § 202a and the
recommendations for regional and municipal energy planning pertaining to the
efficient use of energy and the siting and development of renewable energy
resources contained in the State energy plans adopted pursuant to 30 V.S.A.
§§ 202 and 202b; and
(E) the distributed renewable generation and energy transformation
categories of resources to meet the requirements of the Renewable Energy
Standard under 30 V.S.A. §§ 8004 and 8005; and
(F) Vermont Conservation Design; and
VT LEG #379055 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.394
2025 Page 3 of 8
(4) meet the standards for issuing a determination of energy compliance
included in the State energy plans.
* * *
Sec. 2. 30 V.S.A. § 8010 is amended to read:
§ 8010. SELF-GENERATION AND NET METERING
* * *
(c) In accordance with this section, the Commission shall adopt and
implement rules that govern the installation and operation of net metering
systems.
(1) The rules shall establish and maintain a net metering program that:
(A) advances the goals and total renewables targets of this chapter
and the goals of 10 V.S.A. § 578 (greenhouse gas reduction) and is consistent
with the criteria of subsection 248(b) of this title;
(B) achieves a level of deployment of no less than 20 MW per year
and that is consistent with the recommendations of the Electrical Energy and
Comprehensive Energy Plans under sections 202 and 202b of this title, unless
the Commission determines that this level is inconsistent with the goals and
targets identified in subdivision (1)(A) of this subsection (c). Under this
subdivision (B), the Commission shall consider the Plans most recently issued
at the time the Commission adopts or amends the rules;
* * *
VT LEG #379055 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.394
2025 Page 4 of 8
(3) The rules shall establish standards and procedures governing
application for and issuance or revocation of a certificate of public good for net
metering systems under the provisions of section 248 of this title. In
establishing these standards and procedures:
* * *
(F) This subdivision (F) applies to an application for a net metering
system with a capacity that is greater than 15 25 kilowatts, unless the system is
located on a new or existing structure the primary purpose of which is not the
generation of electricity. With respect to such a system, the rules shall not
waive or include provisions that are less stringent than each of the following:
(i) the requirement of subdivision 248(a)(4)(C) of this title to
provide a copy of the application to the Agencies of Agriculture, Food and
Markets and of Natural Resources; the Department of Public Service; the
Division for Historic Preservation; the municipal legislative body; and the
municipal and regional planning commissions; and
(ii) the requirements of subsection 248(f) (preapplication
submittal) of this title.
* * *
Sec. 3. 30 V.S.A. § 8002 (18) is amended to read:
(18) “Plant” means an independent technical facility that generates
electricity from renewable energy. A group of facilities, such as wind turbines,
VT LEG #379055 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.394
2025 Page 5 of 8
shall be considered one plant if the group is part of the same project and uses
common equipment and infrastructure such as roads, control facilities, and
connections to the electric grid. Common ownership, contiguity in time of
construction, and proximity of facilities to each other shall be relevant to
determining whether a group of facilities is part of the same project.
Independent technical facilities that are collocated on the same parcel shall not
be considered a single plant if each facility uses separate generators, inverters,
and production meters, as applicable, and each facility has a separate
interconnection point to the electric grid. An interconnection point is the point
at which the interconnection between the interconnecting utility’s electric
system and the renewable energy plant’s equipment interface occurs. Utility-
owned electric distribution and transmission lines shall not be considered part
of a plant or interconnection point. For purposes of eligibility in the net-
metering program under section 8010 of this chapter, collocated independent
technical facilities may not exceed a cumulative total of 500 kW in nameplate
capacity.
Sec. 4. 30 V.S.A. § 248 is amended to read:
§ 248. NEW GAS AND ELECTRIC PURCHASES, INVESTMENTS, AND
FACILITIES; CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC GOOD
(a)(1) No company, as defined in section 201 of this subchapter, may:
* * *
VT LEG #379055 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.394
2025 Page 6 of 8
(4)(A) With respect to a facility located in the State, in response to a
request from one or more members of the public or a party, the Public Utility
Commission shall hold a nonevidentiary public hearing on a petition for such
finding and certificate. The public hearing shall either be remotely accessible
or held in at least one county in which any portion of the construction of the
facility is proposed to be located, or both. The Commission in its discretion
may hold a nonevidentiary public hearing in the absence of any request from a
member of the public or a party. From the comments made at a public hearing,
the Commission shall derive areas of inquiry that are relevant to the findings to
be made under this section and shall address each such area in its decision.
Prior to making findings, if the record does not contain evidence on such an
area, the Commission shall direct the parties to provide evidence on the area.
This subdivision (4) does not require the Commission to respond to each
individual comment.
* * *
(K) With respect to a facility located in the State that is five MW or
less, the Commission shall issue a decision on the certificate of public good
application within 12 months following the application being deemed
complete. With respect to a facility located in the State that is greater than five
MW, the Commission shall issue a decision on the certificate of public good
VT LEG #379055 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.394
2025 Page 7 of 8
application within 15 months following the application being deemed
complete.
* * *
(v) The Commission shall have no jurisdiction under this section to
consider the actual or potential impacts caused by any electric distribution
upgrades except to assess impacts under subdivision (b)(3) of this section and
the public health and safety impacts under subdivision (b)(5) of this section.
Party status and notice requirements related to distribution upgrades shall be
consistent with the scope of the Commission’s jurisdiction described in this
subsection, with the exception of affected electric utilities and the Department
of Public Service.
Sec. 5. 3 V.S.A. § 153 is amended to read:
§ 153. GENERAL POWERS; DEPUTY, ASSISTANTS
(a) The Attorney General shall have the general supervision of criminal
prosecutions, shall consult with and advise the State’s Attorneys in matters
relating to the duties of their office, and shall assist them by attending the
grand jury in the examination of any cause or in the preparation of indictments
and informations when, in his or her the Attorney General’s judgment, the
interests of the State require it.
* * *
VT LEG #379055 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.394
2025 Page 8 of 8
(d) The Attorney General shall appoint a Public Energy Advocate who
shall assist applicants with the process for receiving a certificate of public good
under 30 V.S.A. § 248. The Public Energy Advocate shall advocate for the
applicant and the public before the Public Utility Commission for the
development of new energy storage and generation projects.
Sec. 6. POSITION; APPROPRIATION
(a) There is created one full-time permanent exempt Public Energy
Advocate position in the Office of the Attorney General.
(b) In fiscal year 2026, the sum of $120,000.00 is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for the position created in
subdivision (a) of this section.
Sec. 7. ENERGY PROJECTS AND FOREST BLOCKS; REPORT
On or before December 15, 2025, the Public Utility Commission shall
report to the House Committees on Energy and Digital Infrastructure and on
Environment and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy on
how much forest land has been converted for renewable energy generation
facilities and what types of mitigation, if any, were implemented for those
projects.
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379055 v.3